sk_SK.aff
SFX B Y 223
SFX B   0           a          [áéíóúý]rod is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^áéíóúý]rod is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^r]od is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          otok is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          stol is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          to[klnv] is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          [^t]o[klnv] is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          el is:genitive
SFX B   ôl          ola        ôl is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^eoô]l is:genitive
SFX B   0           e          yv is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          [^aiíoý].[^o][knv] is:genitive
SFX B   ček         čka        [aiíoý]ček is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          [oúy]r is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          ner is:genitive
SFX B   us          u          mus is:genitive
SFX B   os          u          mos is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^m]us is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          [^au]s is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          át is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [áéíóúý]vet is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          [^áéíóúý]vet is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^čv]et is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          šit is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          ust is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          kút is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^e]t is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          ivot is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          o[hlm]ov is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^dgklrstv] is:genitive
SFX B   og          gu         zog is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^z]og is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [áéíóúý]rod is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^áéíóúý]rod is:dative
SFX B   0           e          [^áéíóúý]rod is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^r]od is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^o]d is:dative
SFX B   0           u          to[klnv] is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^t]o[klnv] is:dative
SFX B   0           u          el is:dative
SFX B   ôl          olu        ôl is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^aiíoý].[^o][knv] is:dative
SFX B   ček         čku        [aiíoý]ček is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [aeíoúy]r is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^u]s is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^áéíóúý]vet is:dative
SFX B   0           u          o[hlm]ov is:dative
SFX B   og          gu         zog is:dative
SFX B   0           0          . is:accusative
SFX B   0           e          [áéíóúý]rod is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^r]od is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^o]d is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^t]o[klnv] is:locative
SFX B   0           i          el is:locative
SFX B   ôl          ole        ôl is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^áeoô]l is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^n][aeíoúy]r is:locative
SFX B   0           i          ner is:locative
SFX B   us          e          mus is:locative
SFX B   os          e          mos is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^m]us is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^u]s is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [áéíóúý]vet is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^áéíóúý]vet is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^čv]et is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^e]t is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [aá]v is:locative
SFX B   0           e          o[hlm]ov is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^dghklrstv] is:locative
SFX B   0           mi         [áéíóúý]rod is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^r]od is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^o]d is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         to[klnv] is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^t]o[klnv] is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         el is:instrumental
SFX B   ôl          olom       ôl is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^eoô]l is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^aiíoý].[^o][knv] is:instrumental
SFX B   ček         čkom       [aiíoý]ček is:instrumental
SFX B   us          om         mus is:instrumental
SFX B   os          om         mos is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^m]us is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^dgklrstv] is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^z]og is:instrumental
SFX B   0           y          [áéíóúý]rod is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^áéíóúý]rod is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^r]od is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^o]d is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          to[klnv] is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^t]o[klnv] is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           i          iál  is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           e          [^i]ál is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          el is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   ôl          oly        ôl is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^eoô]l is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   ček         čky        [aiíoý]ček is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^aiíoý].[^o][knv] is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [aeíoúy]r is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   us          y          mus is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   os          y          mos is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^m]us is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^u]s is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [áéíóúý]vet is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^áéíóúý]vet is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^čv]et is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^e]t is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          o[hlm]ov is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^dgklrstv] is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           ia         ťan is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   og          gy         zog is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^z]og is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [áéíóúý]rod is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^áéíóúý]rod is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^r]od is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^o]d is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         to[klnv] is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^t]o[klnv] is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         el is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   ôl          olov       ôl is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^eoô]l is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   ček         čkov       [aiíoý]ček is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^aiíoý].[^o][knv] is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [aeíoúy]r is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   us          ov         mus is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   os          ov         mos is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^m]us is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^u]s is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [áéíóúý]vet is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^áéíóúý]vet is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^čv]et is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^e]t is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         o[hlm]ov is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^dgklrstv] is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   og          gov        zog is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^z]og is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [áéíóúý]rod is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [^áéíóúý]rod is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [^r]od is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [^o]d is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         to[klnv] is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [^t]o[klnv] is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         el is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [^eoô]l is:dative is:plural
